Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,133
Class V school district; sale of site; sheriff; report of sale; confirmation.

The sheriff shall file a report of the proceedings pursuant to the order of sale under section 79-10,132. If it appears, upon the filing of such report, that the sale has in all respects been made in conformity to the provisions of sections 79-10,127 to 79-10,135, that the property as described in section 79-10,127 was sold for its fair value under the circumstances and conditions of the sale and for not less than ninety percent of its appraised value, and that a subsequent sale would not realize a greater amount, the court shall enter an order (1) confirming the sale, (2) directing the city to convey title to the property to the purchaser, free and clear of all restrictions upon its use previously imposed by the State of Nebraska, and (3) quieting title in such purchaser.

Laws 1955, c. 319, § 7, p. 987;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1067;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 779.